North Dakota, session 69, HB1405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 28-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Service of summons - Answer - Time limitation.
1. A summons in a civil action served on an individual within the state must include a
reference to a legal self-help program administered by the supreme court.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a defendant shall serve an answer to the
complaint or to a cross-claim, or a reply to a counterclaim, within thirty days after
service upon the pleading in which the claim is asserted.
Page No. 1 25.1119.04000